California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) The processor notifies the department promptly of any material change in the nature of the processor’s operations that conflicts with the information submitted in the operator’s application for
 certification.

(c) (1) An applicant for certification as a processor and a processor applying for renewal of a certification shall complete the precertification training program required by this subdivision and meet all other qualification requirements prescribed by the department, which may include, but are not limited to, requiring the applicant to obtain a passing score on an examination administered by the department.

(2) The department may use staff or industry experts, or may seek expertise available in other state agencies, to provide the training program required by this subdivision, which shall include providing technical assistance to better prepare processors for successful participation in this division, thereby reducing the potential for
 errors, fraud, or other activities that compromise the integrity of the implementation of this division.

(d) A certified processor shall comply with all of the following requirements for operation:

(1) The processor shall not pay a refund value for, or receive a refund value from the department for, any food or drink packaging material or any beverage container or other product that does not have a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560.

(2) The processor shall take those actions that satisfy the department to prevent the payment of a refund value for any food or drink packaging material or any beverage container or other product that does not have a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560.

(3) Unless exempted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14572, the processor shall accept, and pay at least the refund value for, all empty beverage containers, regardless of type, for which the processor is certified.

(4) A processor shall not pay any refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees to a noncertified recycler. A processor may pay refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees to any entity that is identified by the department on its list of certified recycling centers.

(5) A processor shall not pay any refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees on empty beverage containers or other containers that the processor knew, or should have known, were coming into the
 state from out of the state, or are otherwise ineligible for redemption.

(6) A processor shall not claim refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees on empty beverage containers that the processor knew, or should have known, were received from noncertified recyclers or on beverage containers that the processor knew, or should have known, come from out of the state, or are otherwise ineligible for redemption. A processor may claim refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees on any empty beverage container that does not come from out of the state and that is received from any entity that is identified by the department on its list of certified recycling centers.

(7) (A) A processor shall take the actions necessary and approved
 by the department to cancel containers to render them unfit for redemption.

(B) A processor may be authorized by the department to satisfy the cancellation requirements of this section by washing a reusable beverage container or transferring a reusable beverage container for subsequent washing to a processor approved by the
 department.

(8) A processor shall prepare or maintain the following documents involving empty beverage containers, as specified by the department by regulation:

(A) Shipping reports that are required to be prepared by the processor or that are required to be obtained from recycling centers.

(B) Processor invoice reports.

(C) Cancellation verification documents.

(D) Documents authorizing recycling centers to cancel empty beverage containers.

(E) Processor-to-processor transaction receipts.

(F) Rejected container receipts on materials subject to this division.

(G) Receipts for transactions with beverage manufacturers on materials subject to this division.

(H) Receipts for transactions with distributors on materials subject to this division.

(I) Weight tickets.

(9) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (7), a processor shall cooperate with the department and make available its records of scrap transactions when the review of these records is necessary for an audit or investigation by the department.

(e) The
 department may recover, in restitution pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 14591.2, any payments made by the department to the processor pursuant to Section 14573 that are based on the documents specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (d), that are not prepared or maintained in compliance with the department’s regulations, and that do not allow the department to verify claims for program payments.

(f) The department may certify additional models of processors that are determined necessary to implement subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (d), who may be subject to requirements and standards that differ from those set forth in this section. The director shall adopt by regulation the requirements and standards for the certification and operation of those processors no later than January 1, 2024. The regulations shall include, at a minimum, the approval requirements, approval processes, standards of operations, and oversight of those models of processors, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 502, Sec. 2.   (AB 962)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14539.5.

(a) The department shall certify dropoff and collection programs pursuant to this section. The director shall adopt, by regulation, requirements and standards for certification and a dropoff or collection program shall meet all the standards and requirements contained in the regulations for certification. The regulations shall require that all information be submitted to the department under penalty of perjury. The regulations shall require, in addition to any other conditions that may be imposed by the department, that both of the following conditions be met for certification:

(1) The dropoff or collection program demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the department, that the dropoff or collection program will operate in accordance with this division.

(2) The dropoff or collection program notifies the department promptly of any material change in the nature of its operations that conflicts with the information submitted in the application for certification.

(b) A certified dropoff or collection program shall not receive any refund value or processing payment on an empty beverage container that the certified dropoff or collection program knew, or should have known, was received from a noncertified recycler, on any beverage container that the certified dropoff or collection program knew or should have known came from out of this state, or any other beverage container or other product that does not have a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560.

(c) The department may recover, in restitution pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 14591.2, any payment made from the fund to a dropoff or collection program pursuant to Section 14573.5 that is based on a document that is not prepared or maintained in compliance with any applicable recordkeeping requirements required pursuant to this division or the department’s regulations and that does not allow the department to verify the claims for those payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 731, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14540.

The department may review and verify all applications for certification of recycling centers and processors, and may conduct a comprehensive field investigation of any applicant in any manner which the department deems necessary to promote the purposes of this division. This division does not prohibit the department from certifying the same location or entity as both a processor and a recycling center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14541.

(a) The department may issue a certificate pursuant to an initial or renewal application for certification as probationary, and the department may issue any other certificate as probationary pursuant to an enforcement action.

(b) A probationary certificate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued for a limited period of not more than two years. Before the end of the probationary period, the department shall issue a nonprobationary certificate, extend the probationary period for not more than one year, or, after notice to the probationary certificate holder, revoke the probationary certificate. Subsequent to the revocation, the former probationary certificate holder may request a hearing, which, notwithstanding, Section 11445.20 of the Government Code, shall be conducted in the same form as a hearing for an applicant whose original application for certification is denied.

(c) If a hearing is requested pursuant to subdivision (b) and the party requesting the hearing fails to appear on the date scheduled, and does not notify the department at least five days prior to the hearing date that the party will not appear, the department may recover from the party all costs and fees incurred by the department, including attorneys’ and experts’ fees, and any other cost associated with preparing for, or conducting, the hearing.

(d) If conditions are imposed on the certificate holder as part of a disciplinary proceeding conducted pursuant to Section 14591.2, the certificate shall be considered probationary. If, at any time, the certificate holder violates any term or condition of the probationary certificate, the certificate may be revoked or suspended, after three days’ notice, without any further hearing by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 874, Sec. 5.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14541.5.

Any certification or registration granted by the department is a privilege and not a vested right or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 731, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14543.

(a) In order to stimulate the increased use of glass cullet in making new glass beverage containers in the state, the department shall create the Recycled Glass Processing Incentive Grant Program. The grant program shall provide grants to applicants who demonstrate the ability to expand glass cullet processing in the state, subject to both of the following:

(1) The applicant commits to using the grant to expand glass cullet processing facilities for increased processing of glass cullet.

(2) The applicant matches the amount of any grant received from the grant program in an amount equal to or greater than the grant amount.

(b) Within 12 months of receiving a grant from the grant program, the entity receiving the grant shall demonstrate to the department the amount of additional tons of glass cullet processed as a result of utilization of the grant funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 10.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14544.

(a) In order to facilitate increased recycling of empty glass beverage containers in the state, the department shall create the Increased Recycling of Empty Glass Beverage Containers Grant Program. The purpose of the grant program shall be to assist in funding regional pilot programs furnishing bins for collection of empty glass beverage containers from restaurants and on-sale retail licensed establishments licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code). Grants provided under this program may be used for any of the following:

(1) Purchase of bins for the collection of empty glass beverage containers at restaurants and other on-sale retail licensed
 establishments licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code).

(2) Collection and consolidation of contents from the bins.

(3) Transportation of the empty glass beverage containers that are collected to a glass processing facility.

(b) The following entities may be eligible for applying for grants from the grant program created pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Local or regional governmental agencies.

(2) Other entities proposing to establish a regional pilot program to provide empty glass beverage container bins, collection of the contents of those bins, and transportation of the empty glass beverage
 containers collected to a glass processing facility.

(c) Entities receiving grants from the grant program shall expend an amount equal to or greater than the amount of the grant received to create and operate the pilot program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 11.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14545.

(a) In order to facilitate transportation of empty glass beverage containers from throughout the state to glass processing facilities utilizing rail transportation and facilities, the department shall create the Empty Glass Beverage Transportation Grant Program. Funds provided in grants from this program shall be used to facilitate the use of rail transportation of empty glass beverage containers to glass processing facilities within the state.

(b) Entities applying for grants from the grant program shall demonstrate in their application how rail transportation of empty glass beverage containers collected in the state will be facilitated through the use of the grant funds.

(c) Entities receiving grants from the grant program shall match grant funding received in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of the grant received, which shall also be used to facilitate transportation of empty glass beverage containers by rail within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 12.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14547.

(a) (1) Between January 1, 2022, and December 31, 2024, inclusive, the total number of plastic beverage containers filled with a beverage sold by a beverage manufacturer subject to the California Redemption Value, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 14560), for sale in the state shall, on average, contain no less than 15 percent postconsumer recycled plastic per year.

(2) Between January 1, 2025, and December 31, 2029, inclusive, the total number of plastic beverage containers filled with a beverage sold by a beverage manufacturer subject to the California Redemption Value, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 14560), for sale in the state shall, on average, contain no less than 25 percent postconsumer recycled plastic per
 year.

(3) On and after January 1, 2030, the total number of plastic beverage containers filled with a beverage sold by a beverage manufacturer subject to the California Redemption Value, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 14560), for sale in the state shall, on average, contain no less than 50 percent postconsumer recycled plastic per year.

(4) A beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, that contains wine or distilled spirits, shall have an additional two years to comply with each of the deadlines in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3).

(5) A beverage container that contains 46 ounces or more of 100 percent fruit juice or more than 16 ounces of vegetable juice shall not be considered a beverage container for purposes of this subdivision until January 1, 2026.

(6) (A) Beginning January 1, 2025, the director may, on an annual basis, review and determine to adjust the minimum postconsumer recycled content percentage required pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). The director’s review may be initiated by the director or at the petition of the beverage manufacturing industry not more than annually. The department shall adopt regulations to establish the petition process and requirements. The director shall not adjust the minimum postconsumer recycled content requirements above the minimum postconsumer recycled plastic content percentages required pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). In making a determination pursuant to this paragraph, the director shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following factors:

(i) Changes in market conditions, including supply and demand for postconsumer recycled plastics, collection rates, and
 bale availability both domestically and globally.

(ii) Recycling rates.

(iii) The availability of recycled plastic suitable to meet the minimum recycled content requirements pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), including the availability of high-quality recycled plastic, and food-grade recycled plastic from the state’s and other beverage container recycling programs.

(iv) The capacity of recycling or processing infrastructure.

(v) The progress made by beverage manufacturers in achieving the goals of this subdivision.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the director shall not review or adjust a minimum postconsumer recycled content standard while the department is reducing payments
 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14581.

(C) The department may enter into a contract for the services required to implement this section and related regulations developed by the department.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “beverage manufacturing industry” means an association that represents companies that manufacture beverages.

(b) (1) Beginning January 1, 2023, a beverage manufacturer that does not meet the minimum recycled plastic content requirements pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to an annual administrative penalty pursuant to this subdivision. Beginning March 1, 2024, the administrative penalty shall be collected annually, if a reduction has not been approved pursuant to subdivision (e), and calculated in accordance with subdivision (c).

(2) A beverage manufacturer that is assessed penalties pursuant to this subdivision may pay those penalties to the department in quarterly installments or arrange an alternative payment schedule subject to the approval of the department, not to exceed a 12-month payment plan unless an extension is needed due to unforeseen circumstances, such as a public health emergency, state of emergency, or natural disaster.

(c) Beginning March 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the department shall invoice any assessed administrative penalties for the previous calendar year based on the postconsumer recycled plastic content requirement of the previous calendar year. The department shall calculate the amount of the penalty based upon the amount in pounds in the aggregate of virgin and postconsumer recycled plastic material used by the beverage manufacturer to produce beverage containers sold or
 offered for sale in the state, in accordance with the following:

(1) The annual administrative penalty amount assessed to a beverage manufacturer shall equal the product of both of the following:

(A) The total pounds of plastic used multiplied by the relevant minimum postconsumer recycled plastic percentage, less the pounds of postconsumer recycled plastic used.

(B) Twenty cents ($0.20).

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), both of the following shall apply:

(A) The total pounds of plastic used shall equal the sum of the amount of virgin plastic and postconsumer recycled plastic used by the beverage manufacturer, as reported pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14549.3.

(B) If the product calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) is equal to or less than zero, an administrative penalty shall not be assessed.

(d) (1) The department may conduct audits and investigations and take an enforcement action against a beverage manufacturer for the purpose of ensuring compliance with this section and the information reported pursuant to Section 14549.3. The department may take an enforcement action against a beverage manufacturer that fails to pay or underpays the assessed or audited administrative penalty only after notice and hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The department shall keep confidential all business trade secrets and proprietary information about manufacturing processes
 and equipment that the department gathers or becomes aware of through the course of conducting audits or investigations pursuant to paragraph (1). Business trade secrets and proprietary information obtained pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) A beverage manufacturer may obtain a copy of the department’s audit of that beverage manufacturer conducted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) (1) The department shall consider granting a reduction of the administrative penalties assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) for the purpose of meeting the minimum recycled content requirements required pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(2) In
 determining whether to grant the reduction pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following factors:

(A) Anomalous market conditions.

(B) Disruption in, or lack of supply of, recycled plastics.

(C) Other factors that have prevented a beverage manufacturer from meeting the requirements.

(3) In order to receive a reduction of the administrative penalty, a beverage manufacturer shall submit to the department a corrective action plan detailing the reasons why the beverage manufacturer will fail to meet or has failed to meet the minimum postconsumer recycled content standard and the steps the beverage manufacturer will take to comply with the minimum postconsumer recycled content standard within the next reporting
 year. The department may approve the corrective action plan, and may reduce the administrative penalties once it approves the corrective action plan and the beverage manufacturer implements the plan. Administrative penalties shall accrue from the point of noncompliance with the minimum postconsumer recycled content standard if the department disapproves the corrective action plan or if the beverage manufacturer fails to implement the plan.

(f) The Recycling Enhancement Penalty Account is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 14580 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14591.1, administrative penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Recycling Enhancement Penalty Account. Moneys in the Recycling Enhancement Penalty Account shall be expended upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act for the sole purpose of supporting the recycling,
 infrastructure, collection, and processing of plastic beverage containers in the state.

(g) (1) If the Legislature makes an appropriation in the annual Budget Act before June 15, 2027, for this purpose, the department may contract with a research university to study the polyethylene terephthalate and high-density polyethylene markets for all of the following:

(A) Analyzing market conditions and opportunities in the state’s recycling industry for meeting the minimum recycled plastic content requirements for plastic beverage containers required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) Determining the data needs and tracking opportunities to increase the transparency and support of a more effective, fact-based public understanding of the recycling industry.

(C) Recommending further policy modifications and measures to achieve the state’s recycling targets with the least cost and optimal efficiency.

(2) If the Legislature makes the appropriation specified in paragraph (1) and the department undertakes the study, the study shall be completed no later than May 1, 2028.

(3) The department may allocate moneys from the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature as specified in paragraph (1), for the study by June 30, 2027, if all of the following apply:

(A) The department finds that there are sufficient moneys in the fund.

(B) The fund is not operating at a deficit.

(C) The director is not
 exercising authority to implement proportional reductions subject to the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 14581.

(h) A city, county, or other local government jurisdiction shall not adopt an ordinance regulating the minimum recycled plastic content requirements for plastic beverage containers.

(i) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A refillable plastic beverage container.

(2) A beverage manufacturer that sells or transfers 16,000,000 or fewer plastic beverage containers to a distributor, dealer, or consumer located in the State of California during the calendar year for which the beverage manufacturer is reporting pursuant to Section 14549.3.

(j) The
 Legislature encourages beverage manufacturers to use plastic beverage containers that contain 100 percent recycled plastic content.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 4.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14548.

(a) For purposes of this section, “thermoform plastic container” means a plastic container, such as a clamshell, cup, drinking cup, pod, tub, lid, box, tray, egg carton, or similar rigid, nonbottle packaging, formed from sheets of extruded resin and used to package items such as fresh produce, baked goods, nuts, deli items, and nonbottle beverages. The term does not include any of the following:

(1) A lid or seal of a different material type from plastic.

(2) Thermoform plastic containers that are medical devices, medical products that are required to be sterile, prescription medicine, and packaging used for those products.

(3) A refillable thermoform plastic container that ordinarily would be returned to the manufacturer to be refilled and resold.

(4) A plastic beverage container subject to the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500)).

(5) A thermoform plastic container of a resin type for which the total amount of the resin type sold in California annually is either of the following:

(A) Less than 1,000,000 pounds for a resin type other than expanded polystyrene.

(B) Less than 40,000 pounds of expanded polystyrene.

(6) A thermoform plastic container that is designed to be composted and is eligible to be labeled
 “compostable” pursuant to Section 42357.

(b) In order to improve the quality and marketability of empty beverage containers collected for recycling in the state by curbside recycling programs, the department may, subject to the availability of funds, pay a quality incentive payment for thermoform plastic containers diverted from curbside recycling programs.

(c) The department may make a quality incentive payment pursuant to this section to any recycling center certified pursuant to this division.

(d) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for materials that are substantially free of contamination, recycled, and not disposed of after collection.

(e) The amount of the quality plastic incentive payment shall be up to one hundred eighty
 dollars ($180) per ton, as determined by the department.

(f) An operator of a certified recycling center receiving a quality incentive payment shall make available for inspection and review any relevant record that the department determines is necessary to verify the accuracy of data upon which the quality incentive payment is based and the operator’s or certified center’s compliance with any applicable regulation.

(g) The department may make only one quality incentive payment for each thermoform plastic container collected pursuant to this section.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 21.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.

(a) Every glass container manufacturer shall report to the department each month, by a method as determined by the department, the amount of total tons of new glass food, drink, and beverage containers made in California by that glass container manufacturer and the tons of California postfilled glass used in the manufacturing of those new containers.

(b) Each glass container manufacturer in the state shall use a minimum percentage of 35 percent of postfilled glass in the manufacturing of their glass food, drink, or beverage containers measured in the aggregate, on an annual basis, except that if a glass container manufacturer demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that its use of postfilled glass during the annual period is made up of at least 50 percent mixed-color cullet, then that manufacturer shall use a minimum percentage of 25 percent postfilled glass in the manufacturing of its glass food, drink, or beverage containers, measured in the aggregate, on an annual basis.

(c) A glass container manufacturer may seek a reduction or waiver of the minimum postfilled glass percentage required to be used in the manufacture of glass food, drink, or beverage containers pursuant to subdivision (b). The department may grant a reduction or waiver of the percentage requirement if it finds and determines that it is technologically infeasible for the glass container manufacturer to achieve the percentage requirement or if the department determines that a glass container manufacturer cannot achieve the minimum percentage because of a lack of available glass cullet.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “mixed-color cullet” means cullet that does not meet the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) standard specifications for color mix of color sorted postfilled glass as raw material for the manufacture of glass containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.1.

(a) In order to improve the quality and marketability of empty beverage containers collected for recycling in the state by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, the department may, consistent with Section 14581 and subject to the availability of funds, pay a quality incentive payment for each material type, as specified in subdivision (c).

(b) The department may make a quality incentive payment pursuant to this section to either an operator of a curbside recycling program registered pursuant to Section 14551.5, or to any other entity certified pursuant to this division.

(c) Subject to subdivision (a), the department shall pay a
 quality incentive payment for each type of beverage container material in accordance with the following conditions:

(1) For quality incentive payments for empty glass beverage containers, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for color-sorted glass beverage containers that are substantially free of contamination and are used for the manufacturing of glass beverage containers in this state.

(B) The department may make a quality incentive payment for empty glass beverage containers that are either collected color sorted by curbside recycling programs or
 dropoff or collection programs, or that are collected mixed color by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs and are subsequently color sorted by the collector or any other entity certified pursuant to this division.

(C) The amount of the quality incentive payment for empty glass beverage containers shall be up to sixty dollars ($60) per ton, as determined by the department.

(2) For quality incentive payments for empty plastic beverage containers, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for plastic beverage containers collected by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, that are sorted by resin type, consistent with any quality specifications that the department may adopt.

(B) The amount of the quality plastic incentive payment shall be up to one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per ton, as determined by the department.

(3) For quality payments for empty aluminum beverage containers, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The department may make a quality incentive payment only for aluminum beverage containers that are free of any and all metallic and nonmetallic items, other than used aluminum containers.

(B) The department may make a quality incentive payment for empty aluminum beverage containers that are collected commingled by curbside recycling programs or dropoff or collection programs, and subsequently cleaned by the collector or any other entity certified pursuant to this division, of any and all metallic and nonmetallic
 items, other than used aluminum containers, consistent with any quality specifications that the department may adopt.

(C) The amount of the quality incentive payment for empty aluminum beverage containers shall be up to one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per ton, as determined by the department.

(d) An operator of a curbside recycling program or any other certified entity receiving a quality incentive payment shall make available for inspection and review any relevant record that the department determines is necessary to verify the accuracy of data upon which the quality incentive payment is based and the operator’s or certified entity’s compliance with any applicable regulation.

(e) The department may make only one quality incentive payment for each empty beverage container collected pursuant to this
 section.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 14.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Certified entity” means a recycling center, processor, or dropoff or collection program certified pursuant to this division.

(2) “Plastic product” means a finished plastic product that requires no further thermoforming, shaping, or processing before being sold for its specified use. “Plastic product” does not include plastic flake, pellet, sheet, or any other form that is an output from a reclaimer’s processing of empty plastic beverage containers.

(3) “Product manufacturer” means a person who manufactures a plastic product in this state.

(4) “Reclaimer” means a certified entity that purchases empty plastic beverage containers that have been collected for recycling in the state, and that washes and processes, in the state, those empty plastic beverage containers into flake, pellet, sheet, or any other form that is then usable as input for the manufacture of new plastic products by product manufacturers in the state.

(b) In order to develop California markets for empty plastic beverage containers collected for recycling in the state, the department may, consistent with Section 14581 and subject to the availability of funds, pay a market development payment to a reclaimer for empty plastic beverage containers collected and managed pursuant to this section and to a product manufacturer for plastic flake, pellet, sheet, or any other form of plastic purchased from a reclaimer pursuant to this section.

(c) The department shall make a market development payment to a reclaimer or product manufacturer in accordance with this section only if the plastic beverage container is collected, washed, and processed into flake, pellet, sheet, or any other form, and is used in manufacturing, in the state, as follows:

(1) The department shall make a market development payment to a reclaimer for empty plastic beverage containers that are collected, washed, and processed as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), including to a reclaimer that uses the services of a third party to process the empty plastic beverage containers into a form usable for the manufacture of new plastic products.

(2) The department shall make a market development payment to a product manufacturer for plastic flake, pellet, sheet, or any other form of
 plastic purchased from a reclaimer and used by that product manufacturer to manufacture a plastic product in the state, including to a product manufacturer that uses the services of a third party to process the plastic purchased from a reclaimer in manufacturing the plastic product.

(3) The department shall determine the amount of the market development payment, which may be set at a different level for a reclaimer and a product manufacturer, but shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per ton. In setting the amount of the market development
 payment,
 the department shall consider all of the following:

(A) Incentive payments to encourage in-state washing and processing of empty plastic beverage containers collected for recycling in this state.

(B) Incentive payments to encourage in-state manufacturing for a circular economy that utilizes flake, pellet, sheet, or
 any other form processed from empty plastic beverage containers collected for recycling in this state.

(C) The quality of plastic processed, baled, and sold, the types of products manufactured from plastic, and the overall benefit to the beverage container recycling program and advancing circularity in the state.

(D) The market conditions related to scrap values, and pricing of virgin and recycled materials.

(4) The department may make a market development payment to both a reclaimer and a product manufacturer for both the empty plastic beverage container and for the flake, pellet, sheet, or any other form processed by the reclaimer from that same empty plastic beverage container.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030,
 is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 62, Sec. 5.   (SB 166)   Effective July 6, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14549.3.

(a) On or before March 1 of each year, a manufacturer of a beverage sold in a plastic beverage container subject to the California Redemption Value, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 14560), shall report to the department the amount in pounds and by resin type of virgin plastic and postconsumer recycled plastic used by the manufacturer for plastic beverage containers subject to the California Redemption Value for sale in the state in the previous calendar year. The manufacturer shall submit this information to the department under penalty of perjury pursuant to standardized forms in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

(b) On or before March 1,
 2024, and annually thereafter, a plastic material reclaimer shall report to the department the
 amount in pounds and by resin type